Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1035.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW to read as follows:(1) The college board shall develop or revise, and periodically update, a model policy and procedure to prevent and address secondary traumatic stress in the workforce.(2) The model policy and procedure must include the following elements:(a) A commitment to support mental health in the workplace;(b) Promotion of a positive workplace climate with a focus on diversity and inclusion;(c) Establishment of a campus-wide workforce mental health committee with the following functions:(i) Share secondary traumatic stress, stress management, and other mental health resources and supports available through the college board, and the public employees' benefits board;(ii) Share links to a secondary traumatic stress self-assessment tool and any associated resources; and(iii) Report to the board of trustees and the college board at least once per year with a summary of committee activities;(d) Regular assessment of campus-wide implementation of the policy and procedure that includes input from the workforce; and(e) Provision of appropriate resources and training to trustees, administrators, and staff for continuous improvement.(3) The model policy and procedure developed under this section must be posted publicly on the college board website by September 1, 2025. Updates to the model policy and procedure must be posted publicly within a reasonable time of development.(4) By the beginning of the 2025-26 academic year, each district shall adopt, or amend if necessary, policies and procedures that, at a minimum, incorporate all the elements described in subsection (2) of this section. Districts shall periodically review their policies and procedures for consistency with updated versions of the model policy and procedure.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW to read as follows:The college board and each community and technical college shall publish on their websites links to resources, self-assessments, and best practices for faculty, staff, and trustees to prevent and address secondary traumatic stress in the workforce. The college board shall collaborate with the public employees' benefits board and the council of presidents to implement this section.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 28B.35 RCW to read as follows:(1) The regional universities shall develop or revise, and periodically update, a model policy and procedure to prevent and address secondary traumatic stress in the workforce.(2) The model policy and procedure must include the following elements:(a) A commitment to support mental health in the workplace;(b) Promotion of a positive workplace climate with a focus on diversity and inclusion;(c) Establishment of a campus-wide workforce mental health committee with the following functions:(i) Share secondary traumatic stress, stress management, and other mental health resources and supports available through the public employees' benefits board;(ii) Share links to a secondary traumatic stress self-assessment tool and any associated resources; and(iii) Report to each board of trustees and regional universities at least once per year with a summary of committee activities;(d) Regular assessment of campus-wide implementation of the policy and procedure that includes input from the workforce; and(e) Provision of appropriate resources and training to trustees, administrators, and staff for continuous improvement.(3) The model policy and procedure developed under this section must be posted publicly on the regional universities websites by September 1, 2025. Updates to the model policy and procedure must be posted publicly within a reasonable time of development.(4) By the beginning of the 2025-26 academic year, each regional university shall adopt, or amend if necessary, policies and procedures that, at a minimum, incorporate all the elements described in subsection (2) of this section. Regional universities shall periodically review their policies and procedures for consistency with updated versions of the model policy and procedure.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 28B.35 RCW to read as follows:The regional universities shall publish on their websites links to resources, self-assessments, and best practices for faculty, staff, and trustees to prevent and address secondary traumatic stress in the workforce. The regional universities shall collaborate with the public employees' benefits board and the council of presidents to implement this section.--- END ---